District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1601

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3012, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(a), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3012 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3011 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle B of title III of the act may be cited as the “Access to Justice Initiative Establishment Act of 2010”.

Short title: Section 3001 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle A of title III of the act may be cited as “Access to Justice Initiative Amendment Act of 2011”.